Utah statutes.
70A-7a-508.   Warranties of collecting bank as to documents of title.
A collecting bank or other intermediary known to be entrusted with documents
of title on behalf of another or with collection of a draft or other claim
against delivery of documents warrants by the delivery of the documents only
its own good faith and authority even if the collecting bank or other
intermediary has purchased or made advances against the claim or draft to be
collected.
